Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4102
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that DNA data banks are an important
tool in criminal investigations, in the exclusion of individuals who are the
subject of criminal investigations or prosecutions, in deterring and detecting
recidivist acts, and in locating and identifying missing persons and human
remains. Several states have enacted laws requiring persons convicted of certain
crimes to
provide genetic samples for DNA typing tests. Moreover, it is the policy of
this state to assist federal, state, and local criminal justice and law enforcement
agencies in the identification and detection of individuals in criminal investigations
and in locating and identifying missing persons and human remains. It is in
the best interest of this state to establish a State DNA Database for DNA
records and a State DNA Sample Bank as a repository for DNA samples from individuals
convicted of felony offenses
and other specified offenses and from individuals for purposes of assisting
in locating and identifying missing persons and human remains.

Laws 1997, LB 278, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 385, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 29;

Laws 2010, LB190, § 3.